California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
“In this State” or “in the State” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.

“Vendor” includes every person who sells fuel in this state and places, or causes to be placed, the fuel into any receptacle on a motor vehicle from which receptacle fuel is supplied for the propulsion of the vehicle.

“Vendor” does not include a person who places the fuel, or causes the fuel to be placed, into a receptacle on a privately operated passenger motor vehicle with respect to which the annual flat rate fuel tax described in Section 8651.7 has been paid for the current year and to which is attached the current prescribed identification emblem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 22.5.)
-------------------------------------------

8611.

“Sell” includes any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

8612.

“Fuel tank” means any receptacle on a motor vehicle from which fuel is supplied for the propulsion of the vehicle, exclusive of a cargo tank even though fuel is withdrawn directly therefrom for the propulsion of the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1830.)
-------------------------------------------

8613.

“Natural gas” means naturally occurring mixtures of hydrocarbon gases and vapors consisting principally of methane, whether in gaseous or liquid form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1509.)
-------------------------------------------

8615.

“Standard pressure and temperature” means 14.73 pounds of pressure per square inch at 60° Fahrenheit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1509.)
-------------------------------------------

8619.

“Interstate user” includes any person who uses fuel in the propulsion of a motor vehicle in this state and who operates the motor vehicle within and without the state or the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8620.

“Qualified motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is used, designed, or maintained for transportation of persons or property, and that has two axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding 26,000 pounds or 11,797 kilograms, has three or more axles regardless of weight, or is used in combination, when the weight of that combination exceeds 26,000 pounds or 11,797 kilograms gross vehicle weight. “Qualified motor vehicle” does not include a recreational vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8621.

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicle such as a motor home, pickup truck with attached camper, and bus when used exclusively for personal pleasure by an individual. In order to qualify as a recreational vehicle, the vehicle shall not be used in connection with any business endeavor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Tax [8651. - 8657.]

8651.

(a) An excise tax is hereby imposed for the use of fuel at the following rate per gallon:

(1) Fourteen cents ($0.14) during 1990, on and after August 1.

(2) Fifteen cents ($0.15) during 1991.

(3) Sixteen cents ($0.16) during 1992.

(4) Seventeen cents ($0.17) during 1993.

(5) Eighteen
 cents ($0.18) on and after January 1, 1994.

(b) If the federal fuel tax is reduced below the rate of fifteen cents ($0.15) per gallon and federal financial allocations to this state for highway and exclusive public mass transit guideway purposes are reduced or eliminated correspondingly, the tax rate imposed by this section, on and after the date of the reduction, shall be increased by an amount so that the combined state and federal tax rate per gallon equals the following:

(1) Twenty-nine cents ($0.29) during 1990, on and after August 1.

(2) Thirty cents ($0.30) during 1991.

(3) Thirty-one cents ($0.31) during 1992.

(4) Thirty-two cents ($0.32) during 1993.

(5) Thirty-three cents ($0.33) on and after January 1, 1994.

(c) If any person or entity is exempt or partially exempt from the federal fuel tax at the time of a reduction, the person or entity shall continue to be exempt under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 627, Sec. 5.   Effective September 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.4.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 8651, on or after July 1, 2021, the excise tax imposed upon a dimethyl ether-liquefied petroleum gas fuel blend shall be at the rate of six cents ($0.06) for each gallon used.

(b) (1) All references in this code to Section 8651 shall be deemed, with respect to the rate imposed upon a dimethyl ether-liquefied petroleum gas fuel blend on or after July 1, 2021, to also refer to this section.

(2) (A) Neither the tax imposed by this section nor the tax imposed by Section 8651 shall apply to the use of
 dimethyl ether-liquefied petroleum gas fuel blend in a vehicle during any period of time for which the owner or operator of the vehicle has paid the annual flat rate fuel tax as provided in Section 8651.7.

(B) To the extent that an owner or operator has provided written representation to a fuel seller that the owner or operator has prepaid the annual flat rate fuel tax as provided in Section 8651.7, the owner or operator shall be solely responsible for the taxes due under this part, and the fuel seller shall not be liable for collecting and remitting those taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 117, Sec. 4.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 8651, on or after January 1, 1966 the excise tax imposed upon liquefied petroleum gas shall be at the rate of six cents ($0.06) for each gallon of fuel used. All references in this code to Section 8651 shall be deemed, with respect to the rate imposed upon liquefied petroleum gas on or after January 1, 1966, to also refer to this section. Neither the tax imposed by this section nor the tax imposed by Section 8651 shall apply to the use of liquefied petroleum gas in a vehicle during any period of time for which the owner or operator of the vehicle has paid the annual flat rate fuel tax as provided in Section
 8651.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.6.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 8651 and 8651.5, on or after January 1, 1971, and before January 1, 2015, the excise tax imposed upon natural gas shall be at the rate of seven cents ($0.07) for each 100 cubic feet of compressed natural gas used, measured at standard pressure and temperature, and at a rate of six cents ($0.06) for each gallon of liquid natural gas
 used.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 8651 and 8651.5, on or after January 1, 2015, an excise tax imposed upon natural gas shall be imposed as follows:

(A) The rate of eight and eighty-seven hundredths cents ($0.0887) for each 126.67 cubic feet, or 5.66 pounds, of compressed natural gas used, measured at standard pressure and temperature.

(B) The rate of ten and seventeen hundredth cents ($0.1017) for each 6.06 pounds of liquid natural gas used.

(b) (1) All references in this code to Section 8651 shall, with respect to the rate imposed upon natural gas on or after January 1, 1971, also refer to this section.

(2) (A) Neither the tax
 imposed by this section nor the tax imposed by Section 8651 shall apply to the use of compressed natural gas or liquid natural gas used in a vehicle during any period of time for which the owner or operator of the vehicle has paid the annual flat rate fuel tax as provided in Section 8651.7.

(B) To the extent that an owner or operator has provided written representation to a fuel seller that the owner or operator has prepaid the annual flat rate fuel tax as provided in Section 8651.7, the owner or operator shall be solely responsible for the taxes due under this part and the fuel seller shall not be liable for collecting and remitting those taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 805, Sec. 3.   (AB 1907)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.7.

(a) The owner or operator, except an interstate user, of a vehicle propelled by a system using liquefied petroleum gas, dimethyl ether-liquefied petroleum gas fuel blend, liquid natural gas, compressed natural gas, or dimethyl ether may pay the fuel tax for the use of those fuels by paying an annual flat rate fuel tax according to the following schedule:Unladen weightFeeAll passenger cars and other vehicles 4,000 lbs. or less $ 36More than 4,000 lbs. but less than 8,001 lbs. 72More than 8,000 lbs. but less than 12,001 lbs. 12012,001 lbs. or more 168(b) The annual flat rate fuel tax described in subdivision (a) shall be an annual tax. The annual period shall be that period from the end of the month in which the tax was paid to the end of the month prior in the following calendar year. When an owner or operator elects to pay the annual flat rate fuel tax on more than one
 vehicle, the owner or operator may request that the department prorate the tax due on a vehicle added during the annual period, so that all vehicles have the same annual period. In the year a vehicle is added, the annual flat rate fuel tax for that vehicle shall be calculated by dividing the fee set forth in subdivision (a) by 12 and multiplying the resulting amount by the number of months remaining before the beginning of the next annual period.

(c) The department shall adopt an identification procedure for vehicles with respect to which the annual flat rate tax described in subdivision (a) of this section has been paid.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to dimethyl ether-liquefied petroleum gas fuel blend or dimethyl ether until July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 117, Sec. 5.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8651, the excise tax imposed upon ethanol or methanol containing not more than 15 percent gasoline or diesel fuels shall be one-half the rate prescribed by Section 8651 for each gallon of fuel used. 

(b) All references in this code to Section 8651 shall be deemed, with respect to the rate imposed upon ethanol or methanol, to also refer to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.9.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 8651, 8651.5, and 8651.6, on or after July 1, 2021, the excise tax imposed upon dimethyl ether shall be at the rate of six cents ($0.06) for each gallon of dimethyl ether used.

(b) (1) All references in this code to Section 8651 shall, with respect to the rate imposed upon dimethyl ether on or after
 July 1, 2021, also refer to this section.

(2) (A) Neither the tax imposed by this section nor the tax imposed by Section 8651 shall apply to the use of dimethyl ether used in a vehicle during any period of time for which the owner or operator of the vehicle has paid the annual flat rate fuel tax as provided in Section 8651.7.

(B) To the extent that an owner or operator has provided written representation to a fuel seller that the owner or operator has prepaid the annual flat rate fuel tax as provided in Section 8651.7, the owner or operator shall be solely responsible for the taxes due under this part and the fuel seller shall not be liable for collecting and remitting those taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 117, Sec. 6.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8652.

No tax shall be imposed upon any user with respect to that fuel which the user establishes to the satisfaction of the board is used:

(a) To propel an implement of husbandry, truck, or farm tractor used in agricultural operations off the highway and only incidentally operated upon a highway, for the purpose of moving between farms or parts of farms, which farms or parts of farms are in close proximity, and which implement of husbandry, truck or farm tractor is exempt from registration under the Vehicle Code;

(b) To propel any construction
 equipment while operated within the confines and limits of a construction project and only incidentally operated upon the highway and which construction equipment is exempt from vehicle registration pursuant to the Vehicle Code; or

(c) For a purpose other than the generation of power to propel a motor vehicle in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1217.)
-------------------------------------------

8653.

No tax shall be imposed upon any user with respect to that fuel which the user establishes to the satisfaction of the board is used in the operation of a motor vehicle off the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1217.)
-------------------------------------------

8653.1.

No tax shall be imposed on any user with respect to fuel used in the operation of a motor vehicle on any highway which is under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Agriculture and with respect to the use of such highway the user pays, or contributes to, the cost of construction or maintenance thereof pursuant to an agreement with, or permission of, the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1682.)
-------------------------------------------

8654.

No tax shall be imposed as to any fuel used in any motor vehicle owned by any county, city and county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public agency when operated by it over any highway constructed and maintained by the United States or any department or agency thereof within a military reservation in this State. If any such motor vehicle is operated both over such highway and over a public highway outside the military reservation in a continuous trip the tax shall be imposed only as to that portion of the fuel used to operate the vehicle over the public highway outside the military reservation.

Nothing contained
 in this section shall be construed as an exemption from the tax of the use of fuel in any motor vehicle operated upon a public highway within a military reservation, which highway is constructed and or maintained by this State or any political subdivision thereof.

As used in this section, “military reservation” includes any establishment of the United States Government or any agency thereof used by the armed forces of the United States for military, air, or naval operations, including research projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

8655.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Mills-Hayes Act.

(b) No tax shall be imposed upon fuel used by:

(1) Any transit district, transit authority, city, or county owning and operating a local transit system itself or through a wholly owned nonprofit corporation.

(2) Any private entity providing transportation services for the transportation of people under contract or agreement, except general franchise agreements, with a public agency authorized to provide public transportation services, only for fuels consumed while providing services under such
 contracts or agreements entered into subsequent to the effective date of this act.

(3) Any passenger stage corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission when the motor vehicles of such passenger stage corporation are exclusively operated in urban or suburban areas or between cities in close proximity for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation, or profit, provided, however, that the exemption is not extended to any line or lines operated by such passenger stage corporation which shall exceed 50 miles of one-way route mileage.

(4) Any common carrier of passengers
 operating exclusively on any line or lines within the limits of a single city between fixed termini or over a regular route, 98 percent of whose operations, as measured by total route mileage operated, are exclusively within the limits of a single city, and who by reason thereof is not a passenger stage corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(5) Any school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools owning, leasing, or operating buses for the purpose of transporting pupils to and from school and for other school or college activities involving pupils, including, but not limited to, field trips and athletic contests.

(6) Any private entity providing transportation services for the purposes specified in
 paragraph (5) under contract or agreement with a school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools, only for fuels consumed while providing services under those contracts or agreements entered into subsequent to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph.

(c) Notwithstanding the exemption provided for by subdivision (b), any system, corporation, or carrier using fuel exempt under the provisions of subdivision (b) shall, for the privilege of operating vehicles on state highways and freeways, make a payment equal to one cent ($0.01) for each gallon of such exempt fuel used. The payments required by this subdivision shall be paid to the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration in the manner prescribed by the
 department, and such payments shall be treated as a tax for all purposes of this part.

(d) The exemption provided for in subdivision (b) and the payments provided for in subdivision (c) shall not be applicable to fuel used by a charter-party carrier of passengers. The term “charter-party carrier of passengers” has the same meaning as that specified in Section 5360 of the Public Utilities Code and shall further include those transportation services described in subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 5353 of the Public Utilities Code, if such transportation service is rendered as contract carriage and not as common carriage of passengers.

(e) There are in the State of California many local bus transit operators in need of financial assistance from
 sources other than the local property tax. These operators are performing essential public transit service as a vital counterpart of the streets and highways. It is the purpose of this section to provide relief from the payment of use fuel tax for local transit operators and it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds accruing to such operators shall be used for the improvement of their transit operations and to aid in providing better transit service to and from places of employment.

There are also in the State of California many private entities providing public transportation services for the transportation of people in vehicles other than buses under contract or agreement with local government, transit districts or local bus transit operators. It is the purpose of this section to provide relief from the payment of use fuel taxes for diesel fuel
 for those private entities only for fuel consumed while providing these services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.   (SB 359)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Operative on the date prescribed by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

8655.5.

(a) Commencing with the 1984–85 fiscal year, the Controller shall annually transfer from the General Fund to the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, the amount, as determined by the State Board of Equalization, necessary to fully reimburse the account for any revenue loss caused by the exemptions
 provided by paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 8655.

(b) In addition, the Controller shall transfer, on January 1, 1985, the sum of four hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($435,000) from the General Fund to the account to fully reimburse the account for the revenue loss caused by Section 3 of the act enacting this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1663, Sec. 2.   Appropriations vetoed by Governor.   Effective September 30, 1984.   Operative October 1, 1984, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1663.   Note: The appropriations shown in the text of this section were deleted by the Governor in his item-veto message.)
-------------------------------------------

8657.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code) any alcohol produced for use in or as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle shall be taxed as fuel under this part and shall not be subject to taxes under the Alcoholic Beverage Tax Law (Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001)).

(b) The state requirements for determining whether alcohol is produced for use in or as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle and not for use as an alcoholic beverage shall be the same as the
 requirements of the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms of the United States Department of Treasury under federal law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7360 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. International Fuel Tax Agreement [8691. - 8691.]

8691.

Effective on and after January 1, 1996, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9405) of Part 3.5 shall apply to all interstate users.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Permits [8701. - 8716.]



  ARTICLE 1. User [8701. - 8708.]

8701.

Every person desiring to become a user of fuel within this state shall secure a use fuel tax permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

Applications for permits shall be made to the board upon forms prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8703.

On receipt of an application and after the deposit of such security as the board may require pursuant to Section 8951, the board shall issue to the applicant a use fuel tax permit authorizing the applicant to become a user of fuel taxable under this part. The permit is valid until canceled or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

Whenever any user fails to comply with any provision of this part or any rule or regulation of the board prescribed and adopted under this part, the board upon hearing, after giving the user at least 10 days’ notice in writing specifying the time and place of hearing and requiring him to show cause why his permit should not be revoked, may revoke the permit held by him. The notice may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1782.)
-------------------------------------------

8705.

It is unlawful for any person whose permit has been canceled or revoked to operate as a user of fuel in this State until he has fully complied with the provisions of this part and has been issued a new permit or his permit has been reinstated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1782.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.

The board or its authorized representatives may impound the vehicles of a user whose permit has been revoked and who continues to use fuel after having been duly notified by the board of the revocation. The board or its representatives may retain possession of the vehicles until the user fully complies with the provisions of this part and all costs incurred in connection with the impounding or storage of the vehicles have been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1782.)
-------------------------------------------

8707.

Subsequent to the revocation of the permit of a user the board shall reinstate the permit when the user pays the amount of excise tax determined, together with interest and penalties, fully complies with the provisions of this part, and pays a fee of fifty dollars ($50) to the board for reinstatement. The fee shall not be subject to refund except as provided in Section 9151.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1029, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

8708.

The board or its authorized representative may issue a California fuel trip permit to interstate users for entry into this state. The California fuel trip permit shall be valid for four consecutive days and includes any reentry into the state during the four-day period. The fee for issuance of a California fuel trip permit is thirty dollars ($30). Other provisions of this article and Article 1 (commencing with Section 8751) of Chapter 4 do not apply to the holder of a California fuel trip permit who uses only fuel brought into this state in the fuel tank of a
 qualified motor vehicle and fuel purchased from, and delivered into the fuel tank of the qualified motor vehicle by, a vendor. Any use fuel tax paid to a vendor for fuel taken out of the state in the fuel tank of a qualified motor vehicle operated under a California fuel trip permit shall not be refunded to the holder of the permit, notwithstanding any other provisions of this part.

The board may enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Motor Vehicles providing for the issuance of California fuel trip permits by that department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Vendor [8711. - 8716.]

8711.

Every person desiring to become a vendor shall first secure a vendor use fuel tax permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

8712.

Applications for permits shall be made to the board upon forms prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

8713.

On receipt of an application the board shall issue to the applicant a vendor use fuel tax permit authorizing him to become a vendor of fuel taxable under this part. The permit is valid until canceled, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

8714.

Whenever any vendor fails to comply with any provision of this part or any rule or regulation of the board prescribed and adopted under this part, relating to fuel vendors, the board upon hearing, after giving the vendor at least 10 days’ notice in writing specifying the time and place of hearing and requiring the vendor to show cause why his or her permit should not be revoked, may revoke or suspend the permit held by the vendor. The board shall give to the person written notice of the suspension or revocation of his or her permit. The notices may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency
 determination. The board shall not issue a new permit to a vendor whose permit has been revoked or reinstate the permit of a vendor whose permit has been suspended or revoked unless it is satisfied that he or she will comply with the provisions of this part and the rules and regulations of the board, and the vendor pays to the board a fee of fifty dollars ($50) for the reinstatement or issuance of a permit. The fee shall not be subject to refund except as provided in Section 9151.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1528, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.

It is unlawful for any person to operate as a vendor of fuel in this State without a permit or after a permit has been suspended or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1830.)
-------------------------------------------

8716.

(a) A permit shall be held only by persons actively engaging in or conducting a business as a vendor of fuel taxable under this part. Any person not so engaged shall forthwith surrender his or her permit to the board for cancellation. The board may revoke the permit of a person found to be not actively engaged in or conducting a business as a vendor of fuel taxable under this part.

(b) If the permit holder who transfers a business does not notify the board of the transfer, or deliver the permit to the board for cancellation, and the transferee, with the permit holder’s
 actual or constructive knowledge, uses the permit in any way, the transferor shall be liable for taxes under this part, interest computed as specified in Section 8777, and those penalties imposed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) The transferor shall be liable for penalties incurred by the transferee under Sections 8779, 8876, and 9352, but shall not be liable for penalties incurred by the transferee under Sections 8780 and 9353. However, the board may, at its discretion, relieve the transferor from liability for penalties incurred by the transferee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 768, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Collection of Tax by Vendor [8732. - 8735.]



  ARTICLE 1. Collection of Tax by Vendor [8732. - 8735.]

8732.

A vendor of fuel the use of which is taxable under this part, who sells and delivers such fuel into a fuel tank shall, at the time of sale, collect the tax from the user and give to the user a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the board.

When fuel is sold through a keylock mechanism or other unattended mechanism it shall be presumed that the vendor delivered the fuel into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle and the vendor must collect the tax from the user. This presumption shall be rebutted and the vendor shall not collect the tax if the user certifies in writing to the vendor that all fuel delivered to him
 through a specific keylock mechanism or other unattended mechanism will be delivered into bulk containers.

Vendors of fuel required by this section to collect tax from users shall not be required to make such collections on sales and deliveries to users who are authorized by the board, as hereinafter provided, to purchase fuel without payment of tax to a vendor.

The board may issue written authorization to a holder of a valid use fuel permit to purchase fuel from a vendor designated by the user without payment of the tax to the vendor when the board finds (1) that the user consistently is using the fuel in vehicles which are operated partly without this state or off the highways of this state, or the user qualifies for the exemption provided in Section 8655, and (2) that to require collection of the tax from the user by the vendor would cause consistently recurring overpayments of the tax, and (3) that the revenue of the
 state with respect to the tax liability of such user is adequately secured. Such authorization may be revoked when any such condition no longer obtains.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 260.)
-------------------------------------------

8732.1.

Without requiring the issuance of a vendor use fuel tax permit, the board may issue written authorization to a political subdivision of this state which holds a valid user use fuel tax permit to furnish fuel as an accommodation to another political subdivision of this state which holds a valid user use fuel tax permit if the board finds that the political subdivision furnishing the fuel agrees to report and pay all taxes applicable to the fuel it furnishes and each political subdivision agrees to keep such records and file such reports as the board deems necessary to ensure that all applicable taxes shall be paid.

For the purposes of this section “political subdivision of this state” means any governmental organization formed and operating under the authority of the laws of this state and includes counties, cities, cities and counties, school districts, fire protection districts, irrigation districts, and recreation districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

8732.5.

A vendor is relieved from liability to collect use fuel tax which became due and payable subsequent to July 1, 1958, insofar as the sales of the fuel are represented by accounts which have been found worthless and charged off for income tax purposes. If the vendor has previously paid the amount of the tax, he may, under rules and regulations prescribed by the board, take a credit in such amount. If any such accounts are thereafter in whole or in part collected by the vendor, the gallons of fuel represented by the amounts collected shall be included in the first return filed after such collection and the amount of the tax thereon paid with the return. The board may, at
 its option, require the seller to submit periodical reports listing accounts delinquent for a 90-day period or over.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1180.)
-------------------------------------------

8733.

The tax required to be collected by the vendor constitutes a debt owed by the vendor to this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

8734.

The board may require vendors to submit at such times as it shall designate copies of the receipts given pursuant to Section 8732.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

8735.

The provisions of Chapters 4 to 9, inclusive, of this part shall apply to any vendor in the same manner as such provisions apply to any user.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Determinations [8751. - 8880.]



  ARTICLE 1. Returns and Payments [8751. - 8755.]

8751.

The excise tax imposed by this part is due and payable quarterly on or before the last day of the calendar month next succeeding each quarterly period in which a taxable use of fuel occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8751.5.

If any user has paid the tax to a vendor who is the holder of a valid vendor’s permit issued under this part, he shall be allowed a credit against the amount of tax due under Section 8751 with respect to that fuel on which the tax was paid to the vendor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1830.)
-------------------------------------------

8752.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on or before the last day of the calendar month following each quarterly period, every user shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 8608, file with the board a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the amount of any tax due and any other information as the board may require to carry out the purposes of this part. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) This section shall not be applicable to any user whose sole use of fuel subject to the tax imposed by this part is for the propulsion of a privately operated passenger automobile, provided that the fuel used in this state, except fuel brought into this state in the fuel tank of the vehicle, is purchased from and delivered into the fuel tank of the vehicle by a vendor holding a permit issued under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8753.

The user shall accompany each return with a remittance payable to the board for the amount of tax due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 556.)
-------------------------------------------

8754.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board for good cause may extend for not to exceed one month the time for making any return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time, provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(c) Any user to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension to the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 3.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8754.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 18.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8755.

The board, if it deems it necessary in order to ensure payment of the tax imposed by this part, or to facilitate the administration of this part, may require returns and payment of the tax to be made for designated periods other than quarterly periods. On or before the last day of the calendar month following each designated period, a return for the preceding designated period shall be filed with the board in any form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [8760. - 8763.]

8760.

(a) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit
 amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.
